District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.13

Notification of decision and right to judicial review.

The Mayor’s agent shall transmit his or her written decision and any further written statement required by § 4-210.12 to the claimant. If the decision is adverse to the claimant, the Mayor’s agent shall notify him or her of his or her right to judicial review.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1013, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-210.13.